test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-avaltymasj_gt-norm.yaml
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: [авалтымаш-влакда, авалтымаш-шамычда, авалтымашда-влак, авалтымашда-шамыч]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: [авалтымаш-влакдан, авалтымаш-шамычдан, авалтымашда-влакын, авалтымашда-шамычын]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: [авалтымаш-влакланда, авалтымаш-шамычланда, авалтымашда-влаклан, авалтымашда-шамычлан, авалтымаш-влакдалан, авалтымаш-шамычдалан]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: [авалтымаш-влакдам, авалтымаш-шамычдам, авалтымашда-влакым, авалтымашда-шамычым]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl2: [авалтымаш-влакдала, авалтымаш-шамычдала, авалтымашда-влакла, авалтымашда-шамычла, авалтымаш-влаклада, авалтымаш-шамычлада]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Com+PxPl2: [авалтымаш-влакдаге, авалтымаш-шамычдаге, авалтымашда-влакге, авалтымашда-шамычге]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl2: [авалтымаш-влакыштыда, авалтымаш-шамычыштыда, авалтымашда-влакыште, авалтымашда-шамычыште]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: [авалтымаш-влакышкыда, авалтымаш-шамычышкыда, авалтымашда-влакышке, авалтымашда-шамычышке, авалтымашда-влакыш, авалтымашда-шамычыш]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Lat+PxPl2: [авалтымаш-влакешда, авалтымаш-шамычешда, авалтымашда-влакеш, авалтымашда-шамычеш] 
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl2: [авалтымаш-влакдаде, авалтымаш-шамычдаде, авалтымашда-влакде, авалтымашда-шамычде]

     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: [авалтымаш-влакышт, авалтымаш-шамычышт, авалтымашышт-влак, авалтымашышт-шамыч]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: [авалтымаш-влакыштын, авалтымаш-шамычыштын, авалтымашышт-влакын, авалтымашышт-шамычын]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: [авалтымаш-влакыштлан, авалтымаш-шамычыштлан, авалтымашышт-влаклан, авалтымашышт-шамычлан, авалтымаш-влакланышт, авалтымаш-шамычланышт]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: [авалтымаш-влакыштым, авалтымаш-шамычыштым, авалтымашышт-влакым, авалтымашышт-шамычым]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl3: [авалтымаш-влакыштла, авалтымаш-шамычыштла, авалтымашышт-влакла, авалтымашышт-шамычла, авалтымаш-влаклашт, авалтымаш-шамычлашт]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Com+PxPl3: [авалтымаш-влакыштге, авалтымаш-шамычыштге, авалтымашышт-влакге, авалтымашышт-шамычге]
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl3: [авалтымаш-влакыштышт, авалтымаш-шамычыштышт, авалтымашышт-влакыште, авалтымашышт-шамычыште] 
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: [авалтымаш-влакышкышт, авалтымаш-шамычышкышт, авалтымашышт-влакышке, авалтымашышт-шамычышке, авалтымашышт-влакыш, авалтымашышт-шамычыш] 
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Lat+PxPl3: [авалтымаш-влакешышт, авалтымаш-шамычешышт, авалтымашышт-влакеш, авалтымашышт-шамычеш] 
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl3: [авалтымаш-влакыштде, авалтымаш-шамычыштде, авалтымашышт-влакде, авалтымашышт-шамычде]
